el: Τύπος στερέωσης δίσκου φρένου: 6 μπουλονιών; Center Lock; Κανένα; Άλλο
nb: Monteringstype for skivebremsrotor: 6-bolters; Center Lock; Ingen; Annet
sv: Typ av bromsskivor: 6-bult; Center Lock; Inget; Övrigt
es: Tipo de montaje de rotor de freno: 6 tornillos; Center Lock; Ninguno; Otro
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação do disco de freio: 6 parafusos; Center Lock; Nenhum; Outro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на ротора на дисковата спирачка: С 6 болта; Center Lock; Няма; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al rotorului frânei cu disc: 6 șuruburi; Center Lock; Niciunul; Altele
tr: Disk fren rotoru montaj tipi: 6 cıvatalı; Merkezi kilitli; Yok; Diğer
ru: Тип крепления ротора дискового тормоза: 6 болтов; Center Lock; Нет; Другое
sk-SK: Typ montáže rotora kotúčovej brzdy: 6 skrutiek; Center Lock; Žiadne; Iné
nl: Type montage schijfremmotor: 6-bouts; Center Lock; Geen; Overig
cs: Typ uchycení kotouče brzdového kotouče: 6 šroubů; Center Lock; Žádné; Ostatní
zh-TW: 碟煞車碟盤安裝類型: 6 孔; 中心鎖入 (Center Lock); 無; 其他
pl: Typ mocowania tarczy hamulca tarczowego: Na 6 śrub; Center Lock; Brak; Inny
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže rotorja kolutne zavore: 6-vijakov; Center Lock; Brez; Drugo
de: Befestigungstyp der Bremsscheibe: 6-Loch; Center Lock; Keine; Sonstige
ja: ディスクブレーキローターマウントタイプ: 6ボルト; センターロック; なし; その他
ko: 디스크 브레이크 로터 장착 유형: 6볼트; 센터 락; 없음; 기타
vi: Loại ngàm gắn đĩa phanh: 6 bu-lông; Center Lock; Không có; Khác
fr: Type de fixation du disque de frein: 6 trous; Center Lock; Aucun; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača disk kočnog rotora: Sa 6 vijaka; Center Lock; Nijedan; Ostalo
en: Disc brake rotor mount type: 6-bolt; Center Lock; None; Other
zh-CN: 碟刹盘安装类型: 6 螺栓; Center Lock; 无; 其他
hu: Tárcsafék rotor rögzítési típusa: 6 csavaros; Center Lock; Nincs; Egyéb
fi: Jarrulevyn kiinnitystyyppi: 6-pulttinen; Center Lock; Ei mitään; Muu
lt-LT: Diskinių stabdžių rotorių montavimo tipas: 6 varžtų; „Center Lock“; Nėra; Kita
da: Monteringstype for skivebremseskive: 6-bolt; Center Lock; Ingen; Anden
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do rotor de travão de disco: 6 parafusos; Center Lock; Nenhum; Outro
it: Tipo di montaggio del rotore del freno a disco: A 6 fori; Center Lock; Nessuno; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งจานเบรก: น็อต 6 ตัว; Center Lock; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ